Wisconsin, session 2025, AB65.
do enact as follows:AB65,1Section 1. 943.10 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:943.10 (1m) (intro.) Whoever intentionally enters any of the following places without the consent of the person in lawful possession and with intent to steal or commit a felony or a violation of s. 940.60 (1) or 940.65 (1) in such place is guilty of a Class F felony: Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab65 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab65 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB65 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB65 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB65: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting